Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1245.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Staff Sergeant Steven R. Tudor Memorial Highway.(a) Findings.--The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:(1) Staff Sergeant Steven R. Tudor was a proud native of Dunmore Borough, Lackawanna County, and a graduate of Dunmore High School. Immediately following his graduation in 1989, he enlisted in the United States Army and began what would become more than 18 years of dedicated service to the nation.(2) During his distinguished military career, Staff Sergeant Tudor served as a Transportation Non-Commissioned Officer assigned to Company F, 210th Brigade Support Battalion, within the 2nd Brigade Combat Team of the 10th 12345678910111213141516171819 Mountain Division. In this role, he was responsible for critical logistical and transportation operations necessary to support combat and humanitarian missions conducted by United States forces.(3) While deployed overseas in support of military operations, Staff Sergeant Tudor's forward operating base came under attack by indirect enemy fire. Staff Sergeant Tudor and two fellow soldiers from his unit were wounded during the attack. Despite the efforts of medical personnel, Staff Sergeant Tudor later succumbed to his injuries, giving his life in service to the United States.(4) Throughout his military career, Staff Sergeant Tudor completed numerous specialized training programs and received many awards and decorations, including the Purple Heart, Army Commendation Medal, Army Achievement Medal, Army Good Conduct Medal and the Combat Action Badge, among other honors recognizing his service and sacrifice.(5) Staff Sergeant Tudor's dedication to his fellow soldiers, his community and his country reflect the highest traditions of military service, and his sacrifice continues to be remembered by his family, fellow service members and the residents of Dunmore Borough and Lackawanna County.(6) The Commonwealth honors Staff Sergeant Steven R. Tudor's service and sacrifice by designating a portion of Blakely Street in his hometown as the Staff Sergeant Steven R. Tudor Memorial Highway.(b) Designation.--The section of Blakely Street, State Route 6011 and Pennsylvania Route 347, from the intersection with Pine Street to the intersection with Drinker Street in Dunmore Borough, Lackawanna County, is designated the Staff Sergeant 20260SB1245PN1532 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Steven R. Tudor Memorial Highway.(c) Signs.--The Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs displaying the name of the highway to traffic in both directions on the highway.Section 2. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260SB1245PN1532 - 3 - 123456